Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-333
Meandered lakes; beds; dedication to public use; commission authorized to improve; jurisdiction.

Meandered lakes, the shore lines of which were meandered by government survey, and the beds thereof, are declared to be the property of the state for the benefit of the public, and the revenue therefrom and resources therein shall be subject to the Game Law and the rules and regulations of the commission relative thereto. The commission shall have authority to improve meandered lakes and to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to make proper use of the same. Nothing in this section shall be construed as claiming title in the State of Nebraska to any lake or stream or that portion of a lake or stream located upon lands to which patents have been issued by the United States to private individuals or persons.

Laws 1929, c. 112, IV, § 11, p. 425;

C.S.1929, § 37-411;

R.S.1943, § 37-411;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-411;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 91.